District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-775

Private facilities — Prosecutions.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1908, 35 Stat. 65, ch. 148, § 5
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(i), 30 DCR 5778

History

1981 Ed., § 32-105.
1973 Ed., § 32-305.

Prior Codifications